Hawaii, session 2026, GM1115.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that time share
accommodations form an important component of Hawaii's visitor
industry and provide a consistent and steady stream of visitors
and revenue for the State's overall economy.
The legislature further finds that the time share industry
itself has matured so that many of Hawaii's time share units are
now associated with international hotel and lodging companies
that hold reputable and recognized brands.
The legislature also finds that the State's existing time
share registration requirement for developers requires filing
for renewal of registrations and filing when there are
amendments to time share plans. However, review and approval of
these registrations are often significantly delayed, which
creates a burden on the time share industry and its ability to
maintain and attract time share owners and consumers. Delays in
the approval of amendments also prevent consumers from receiving
the most current information about purchases of time shares.
2026-2135 HB1946 SD2 SMA.docx
fflllllHIDIIHIMHBIIIIIH

Page 2
H.B. NO.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to:
(1) Provide that applications for registration renewals
required by section 514E-10, Hawaii Revised Statutes,
shall be deemed approved thirty days after receipt of
all required documents, unless the director of
commerce and consumer affairs issues a deficiency
letter within that period; and
(2) Provide that any amendment to a required time share
plan registration shall be deemed approved by
operation of law on the sixtieth day after the
amendment is submitted to the director of commerce and
consumer affairs, unless the director issues a
deficiency letter within that period.
SECTION 2. Section 514E-10, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§514E-10 Registration required; developer, acquisition
agent, plan manager, and exchange agent; registration renewal;
title report; title holding trusts. (a) A developer shall not
offer or dispose of a time share unit or a time share interest
unless the disclosure statement required by section 514E-9 is
filed with the director pursuant to the time specified in this
2026-2135 HB1946 SD2 SMA.docx

Page 3
H.B. NO. ""2
chapter, or the development is exempt from filing, and the time
share plan to be offered by the developer is accepted by the
director for registration under this chapter. The director
shall not accept a developer’s time share plan if the developer
does not possess a history of honesty, truthfulness, financial
integrity, and fair dealing.
(b) An acquisition agent (including the developer if it is
also the acquisition agent) shall register under this chapter by
filing with the director a statement setting forth the time
share plan for which it is providing prospective
purchasers, its address, the telephone number, other information
required by the director as provided by rules adopted pursuant
to chapter 91, and, if the acquisition agent is not a natural
person, the name of the responsible managing employee; provided
that an acquisition agent licensed under chapter 467 as a real
estate broker shall not be required to register under this
chapter. All acquisition agents not licensed under chapter 467
shall be approved by the director. The director shall not
approve any acquisition agent who is not of good character and
who does not possess a reputation for honesty, truthfulness, and
fair dealing. The acquisition agent shall furnish evidence that
2026-2135 HB1946 SD2 SMA.docx
■MWillilIHMIIIII

Page 4
H.B. NO.
the acquisition agent is bonded as required by rules adopted by
the director pursuant to chapter 91 to cover any violation by
the acquisition agent of any solicitation ordinance or other
regulation governing the use of the premise or premises in which
the time share plan is promoted; provided that the acquisition
agent shall be separately bonded for each time share plan for
which it is providing prospective purchases.
(c) A plan manager (including the developer if it is also
the plan manager) shall register under this chapter by filing
with the director a statement setting forth the time
share plan that it is managing, its principal office address,
telephone number, and responsible managing employee. The plan
manager shall furnish evidence that the plan manager is bonded
as required by rules adopted by the director pursuant to chapter
91 to cover any default of the plan manager and any of its
employees of their duties and responsibilities; provided that
the plan manager shall be separately bonded for each time share
plan under the management of the plan manager.
(d) An exchange agent (including the developer if it is
also an exchange agent) shall register under this chapter by
filing with the director a statement setting forth the time
2026-2135 HB1946 SD2 SMA.docx 4
■■MMilHIIMgHHIHII

Page 5
H.B. NO.
[■sfeaaeiftg] share plan for which it is offering exchange services,
its principal office address and telephone number, and designate
its responsible managing employee.
(e) Any plan manager or developer registration required in
this section shall be renewed by December 31 of each even-
numbered year, and any acquisition agent or exchange agent
registration required in this section shall be renewed on
December 31 of each odd-numbered year; provided that this
subsection shall not relieve the person required to register
from the obligation to notify the director promptly of any
material change in any information submitted to the director,
nor shall it relieve the developer of its obligation to promptly
file amendments or supplements to the disclosure statement, and
to promptly supply the amendments or supplements to purchasers
of time share interests. Applications for renewal required by
this section shall be deemed approved thirty days after receipt
of all documents required under subsection (f) and section
16-106-4.2, Hawaii Administrative Rules, unless the director
issues a deficiency letter detailing the specific deficiencies
of the filing before the end of the thirtieth day.
2026-2135 HB1946 SD2 SMA.docx 5
viiiwwiiiBiimm

Page 6
H.B. NO.
(f) An application for renewal of a developer registration
shall be on a form prescribed by the director and shall include:
[-H4- A-ett-ir-rent-di:aeiostt-re -strotefftent—that mcet-s-t-he
e#—9—and—seet-ieft—lr6—lr0-6—St
Hawaii■ Admin-iotrativc Rules-/—if not already on file,*
4^-)-] (1) A statement that is certified by the developer to
be true and correct in all respects and that
identifies, as appropriate:
(A) The time share units in the time share plan
registered pursuant to this chapter; the total
number of time share interests registered for
sale in each time share unit pursuant to this
chapter; and the total number of time share
interests that have not yet been sold as of the
date specified in the developer's certification,
which date shall [ftofe] be no more than sixty days
[prior to] before the date of the developer's
certification; or
(B) The property in the time share plan registered
pursuant to this chapter; the total number of
points registered for sale in each property
2026-2135 HB1946 SD2 SMA.docx 6

Page 7
H.B. NO.
pursuant to this chapter; and the total number of
points in the time share plan that have not yet
been sold as of the date specified in the
developer's certification, which date shall [not]
be no more than sixty days [p^Mrea?—fee] before the
date of the developer's certification;
[-{-34-] (2) If the developer is a corporation, partnership,
joint venture, limited liability company, or limited
liability partnership, an original certificate of good
standing issued by the business registration division
of the department of commerce and consumer affairs
[ftefe-] no more than forty-five days before the date of
submission of the renewal application; and
[-{-4-)-] The biennial renewal fee.
(g) Developers shall not be required to include the
following in an application for renewal of a developer
registration of a time share plan;
(1) A financial statement of the developer; or
(2) A policy of title insurance, a preliminary title
report, abstract of title, or certificate of title on
2026-2135 HB1946 SD2 SMA.docx
HMininiuHmiMiia

Page 8
H.B. NO.
the time share units or time share interests in the
time share plan.
(h) Any amendment to a time share plan registration
required by this chapter, except for amendments that add
inventory to or remove inventory from a time share plan, shall
be approved by operation of law on the sixtieth day after the
amendment is submitted to the director, unless the director
issues a deficiency letter before the end of the sixtieth day.
A deficiency letter shall list all deficiencies and
describe each deficiency in sufficient detail to enable the
applicant to address the deficiency.
In the event that a deficiency letter is not issued within
the sixty-day period, upon request by the applicant, the
director shall furnish to the applicant, within ten business
days after receipt of the applicant's request, a letter
confirming that the amendment has been approved either by action
of the director or by operation of law.
[-0 4-] (i) A developer's application for registration or
annexation shall include:
2026-2135 HB1946 SD2 SMA.docx 8
MHUHIinilHIIHH

Page 9
H.B. NO.
(1) A list of the projects containing the time share units
that are included in the application and that are
located outside the State; and
(2) A statement by the developer that it has verified that
the use of each of those out-of-state time share units
for time sharing purposes in the manner contemplated
by the developer's time share plan is either in
compliance with or not prohibited by the zoning and
land use laws and regulations of the jurisdiction
where the time share units are located.
The developer shall not be required, as part of the developer
registration, to submit any other evidence that the use of out-
of-state time share units for time sharing purposes in the
developer's time share plan is either in compliance with or not
prohibited by the zoning and land use laws and regulations of
the jurisdiction where the time share units are located.
(j) To the extent that a time share plan utilizes a
title holding trust to protect the rights of purchasers to use
the time share property from blanket liens that may arise
subsequent to the closing of the sale of a time share interest:
(1) The developer shall submit a title report:
2026-2135 HB1946 SD2 SMA.docx 9
wmniiiiwiinHinwiM

Page 10
H.B. NO.
(A) Showing that title to the time share units or
time share interest to be protected by a title
holding trust has been conveyed to the trustee;
and
(B) Showing the recordation of any documents required
to be recorded for the purpose of protecting the
rights of purchasers to use the time share
property from blanket liens that will remain on
title subsequent to the closing; and
(2) The developer shall not thereafter be required to
submit additional title reports on property covered by
a title report that meets the requirements of
paragraph (1) unless otherwise required in another
section of this chapter.
[[(j)4] (k) To the extent that a time share plan utilizes a
notice of time share plan to protect the rights of purchasers to
use the time share property from blanket liens that may arise
subsequent to the closing of the sale of a time share interest:
(1) The developer shall submit a title report:
2026-2135 HB1946 SD2 SMA.docx 10
HniMiiniiinwHuiiiHii

Page 11
H.B. NO.
(A) Showing that a notice of time share plan has been
recorded on title to the time share units or time
share interests to be so protected; and '
(B) Showing the recordation of any documents required
to be recorded for the purpose of protecting the
rights of purchasers to use the time share
property from blanket liens that will remain on
title subsequent to the closing; and
(2) The developer shall not thereafter be required to
submit additional title reports on property covered by
a title report that meets the requirements of
paragraph (1) unless otherwise required in another
section of this chapter.
(1) To the extent that a time share plan utilizes
alternative arrangements to protect the rights of purchasers to
use the time share property from blanket liens:
(1) The developer shall submit a title report showing the
recordation of all documents that, as part of the
alternative arrangements accepted by the director, are
required to be recorded for the purpose of protecting
2026-2135 HB1946 SD2 SMA.docx
■nniHiDiiiiiiiinMiinn

Page 12
H.B. NO.
the rights of purchasers to use the time share
property from blanket liens; and
(2) The developer shall not thereafter be required to
submit additional title reports on property covered by
a title report that meets the requirements of
paragraph (1) unless otherwise required in another
section of this chapter."
SECTION 3. This Act does not affect rights and duties that
matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were
begun before its effective date.
SECTION 4. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect on September 1,
2026.
2026-2135 HB1946 SD2 SMA.docx 12
iniDaniiniiBiHHiiiii

H.B. NO.
APPROVED this 19th day of May , 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 1946, HD 2, SD 2
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 23, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 1946, H.D. 2, S.D. 2
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: April 14, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Third Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
3717